Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3302
Terms, defined.

As used in the Offstreet Parking District Act, unless the context otherwise requires, offstreet parking facilities includes parking lots, garages, buildings, and multifloor buildings for the parking of motor vehicles.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 2, p. 198;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-813;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 2, p. 437;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 180.